Utah statutes.
77-7-10.   Telegraph or telephone authorization of execution of arrest warrant.

Any magistrate may, by an endorsement on a warrant of arrest, authorize by telegraph, telephone or other reasonable means, its execution. A copy of the warrant or notice of its issuance and terms may be sent to one or more peace officers. The copy or notice communicated authorizes the officer to proceed in the same manner under it as if he had an original warrant.

